Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2167.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) (1) It shall be unlawful for any person to store or keep
any firearm, rifle or shotgun, large capacity magazine firearm or machine
gun unless such firearm is secured in a locked container or equipped with a
tamper-resistant mechanical lock or other safety device, properly engaged
so as to render the weapon inoperable by any person other than the owner
or other lawfully authorized user.
(2) It shall be unlawful for any person to store or to keep any stun gun
unless the weapon is secured in a locked container accessible only to the
owner or other lawfully authorized user.
(3) It shall be unlawful to store a rifle or shotgun that is not a large-
capacity firearm in an area where a person younger than 18 years of age
has access to such place.
(4) For purposes of this section, such firearm or weapon shall not be
deemed stored or kept if carried by or under the control of the owner or
other lawfully authorized user.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) is a class A nonperson misdemeanor.
(c) It shall be unlawful to store a rifle or shotgun that is a large-
capacity firearm or machine gun in a place where a person younger than
18 years of age may have access to such firearm.
(d) A violation of subsection (c) is a level 9, nonperson felony.
(e) A violation of the provisions of this section shall be evidence of
wanton or reckless conduct in any criminal or civil proceeding if a person
under the age of 18 who was not a trespasser or was a foreseeable
trespasser acquired access to a weapon and such access results in the
personal injury to or the death of any person.
(f) This section shall not apply to the storage or keeping of any
firearm, rifle or shotgun that uses a matchlock, flintlock, percussion cap or
similar type of ignition system and that was manufactured in or prior to the
year 1899, or to any replica of any such firearm, rifle or shotgun if such
replica is not designed or redesigned for using rimfire or conventional

HB 2167 2
centerfire fixed ammunition.
(g) As used in this section, "large-capacity magazine" means any
magazine that holds more than 10 rounds of ammunition.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.